North Carolina, session 2025, HB819.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY CHANGES
SECTION 1.1.(a) G.S. 143B-1320(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Exemptions. – Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the provisions of
this Chapter do not apply to the following entities: the General Assembly, the Judicial
Department, and The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions. institutions,
and the State Highway Patrol. These entities may elect to participate in the information
technology programs, services, or contracts offered by the Department, including information
technology procurement, in accordance with the statutes, policies, and rules of the Department.
The election must be made in writing, as follows:
(1) For the General Assembly, by the Legislative Services Commission.
(2) For the Judicial Department, by the Chief Justice.
(3) For The University of North Carolina, by the Board of Governors.
(4) For the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, by the
respective boards of trustees.
(5) For the State Highway Patrol, by the Commander of the State Highway
Patrol."
SECTION 1.1.(a1) If House Bill 549, 2025 Regular Session, becomes law,
G.S. 143B-1320(b), as amended by Section 2 of that act and subsection (a) of this section, reads
as rewritten:
"(b) Exemptions. – Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, this Article does not
apply to the following entities: the General Assembly, the Judicial Department, The University
of North Carolina and its constituent institutions, and the Office of the State Auditor. Auditor,
and the State Highway Patrol. These entities may elect to participate in the information
technology programs, services, or contracts offered by the Department, including information
technology procurement, in accordance with the statutes, policies, and rules of the Department.
The election must be made in writing, as follows:
(1) For the General Assembly, by the Legislative Services Commission.
(2) For the Judicial Department, by the Chief Justice.
(3) For The University of North Carolina, by the Board of Governors.
*H819-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) For the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, by the
respective boards of trustees.
(5) For the Office of the State Auditor, by the State Auditor.
(5)(6) For the State Highway Patrol, by the Commander of the State Highway
Patrol."
SECTION 1.1.(b) Section 38.4 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 38.4.(a) In accordance with G.S. 143B-1325(c)(13), and notwithstanding any
other provision of Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes to the contrary, the State
Highway Patrol, the State Bureau of Investigation, Investigation and the Division of Emergency
Management within the Department of Public Safety shall continue to be entirely exempt from
any and all information technology oversight by the Department of Public Safety and the
Department of Information Technology. The State Highway Patrol, the State Bureau of
Investigation, and the Division of Emergency Management shall initiate a pilot project where
those divisions the division shall be deemed as a separate, stand-alone entities entity within the
Department of Public Safety in all matters related to information technology, and each the
division shall autonomously manage their its own respective information technology
infrastructure and all associated services without oversight from the Department of Information
Technology or the Department of Public Safety. Exemption from information technology
oversight includes, but is not limited to, the following:
…
"SECTION 38.4.(b) This section expires on June 30, 2025.2027."
SECTION 1.1.(c) G.S. 143B-1325(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Participating Agencies. – The State CIO shall prepare detailed plans to transition each
of the participating agencies. As the transition plans are completed, the following participating
agencies shall transfer information technology personnel, operations, projects, assets, and
appropriate funding to the Department of Information Technology:
…
(13) Department of Public Safety, with the exception of the following:
a. State Bureau of Investigation.
b. Repealed by Session Laws 2024-57, s. 3E.1(v), effective December
11, 2024.
c. Division of Emergency Management.
The State CIO shall ensure that State agencies' operations are not adversely impacted under the
State agency information technology consolidation."

PART II. CHANGES TO THE BROADBAND POLE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. Section 38.10 of S.L. 2021-180, as amended by Section 16.4 of S.L.
2022-6, reads as rewritten:
"BROADBAND ACCELERATION
…
"SECTION 38.10.(b) The Broadband Pole Replacement Program (hereinafter "Program")
is hereby established for the purpose of speeding and facilitating the deployment of broadband
service to individuals, businesses, agricultural operations, and community access points in
unserved areas by reimbursing a portion of eligible pole replacement costs incurred by
communications service providers. A communications service provider who pays or incurs the
costs of removing and replacing an existing pole pole, or placing facilities underground to better
protect the critical infrastructure from natural disasters, in connection with a qualified project
may apply to the Department for reimbursement in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of
eligible pole replacement costs paid or incurred by the applicant or ten thousand dollars
($10,000), whichever is less, for each pole replaced.replaced or, in the case of placing facilities
underground, fifty percent (50%) of such costs.
Page 2 House Bill 819-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
"SECTION 38.10.(g) A pole owner shall promptly review a request for access, perform
surveys, provide estimates and final invoices, and complete, or require the completion by other
attaching entities of, any make-ready work necessary for purposes of offering broadband service
in an unserved area. A pole owner shall provide a good-faith estimate for any make-ready costs
to the communications service provider within 60 days after receipt of a complete application for
access. If requested by the communications service provider, the pole owner shall provide
accompanying documentation indicating the basis of all estimated fees or other charges,
including, but not limited to, administrative costs, that form the basis of its estimate. A good-faith
estimate shall remain valid for 14 days. To accept a good-faith estimate, a communications
service provider must provide the pole owner with written acceptance and payment of the
good-faith estimate. Make-ready work shall be conditioned upon payment of the good-faith
estimate and shall be completed within a reasonable time frame mutually agreed to by the
communications service provider and the pole owner. A pole owner may treat multiple requests
from a single communications service provider as one application for access when the requests
are filed within 90 days of one another. A pole owner may deviate from the time limits specified
in this subsection during performance of make-ready work for good and sufficient cause that
renders it infeasible to complete make-ready work within the time limits specified in this
subsection. Any deviation from the time limits specified in this subsection shall extend for a
period no longer than necessary. A communications service provider shall promptly be notified,
in writing, of the reason for a deviation and the new completion date estimate. A communications
service provider shall provide notice, in writing, to the pole owner no later than 14 days after
attaching equipment to a pole in an unserved area. This subsection shall not apply to poles owned
by a utility.
"SECTION 38.10.(h) A party subject to a dispute arising under subsection (g) of this section
may invoke the dispute procedures authorized in G.S. 62-350 in the same manner as a party
seeking resolution of a dispute under G.S. 62-350(c), and the Utilities Commission shall issue a
final order resolving the dispute within 120 days of the date the proceedings were initiated;
provided, however, the Commission may extend the time for issuance of a final order for good
cause and with the agreement of all parties. In such a dispute, the Commission shall apply the
provisions of this section notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any existing agreement.
This subsection shall not apply to poles owned by a utility.
"SECTION 38.10.(i) No later than 60 days after the date funds are appropriated to the
Program special fund, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the Department shall maintain and
publish on its website all of the following:
(1) The number of applications for reimbursement received, processed, and
rejected, including the reasons applications were rejected.
(2) The amount of each reimbursement, the total number of reimbursements, and
the status of any pending reimbursements.
(3) The estimated remaining balance in the Program special fund.
"SECTION 38.10.(j) The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(4) Eligible pole replacement cost. – The actual and reasonable costs paid or
incurred by a party after June 1, 2021, to (i) remove and replace a pole,
including the amount of any expenditures to remove and dispose of the
existing pole, purchase and install a replacement pole, and transfer any
existing facilities to the new pole. pole or (ii) place facilities, including lines,
conduit, and related equipment, underground to better protect the critical
infrastructure from natural disaster. The term includes costs paid or incurred
by the party responsible for the costs of a pole replacement to reimburse the
party that performs the pole replacement. The term does not include costs that
House Bill 819-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the party incurs initially that have been reimbursed to the party by another
party ultimately responsible for the costs.
(5) Pole. – Any pole used, wholly or partly, for any wire communications or
electric distribution, irrespective of who owns or operates the pole.pole,
including poles owned by a utility.
(6) Pole owner. – A city or cooperatively organized entity that owns utility poles.
(7) Qualified project. – A project undertaken by a communications service
provider that is not affiliated with a pole owner seeking to provide or, due to
natural disaster or other force majeure event, restore, temporarily or
permanently, qualifying internet access service on a retail basis to one or more
households, businesses, agricultural operations, or community access points
in an unserved or underserved area. The project may be affiliated with a
cooperatively organized entity that owns utility poles but shall not be affiliated
with a city that owns utility poles. A pole owner whose affiliate seeks
reimbursement for a qualified project shall not pass through the costs for
which reimbursement is sought to unaffiliated communications service
providers and shall schedule and perform all work in a nondiscriminatory
fashion.
…
(9) Unserved area. – An area in which, according to the most recent map of fixed
broadband internet access service made available by the Federal
Communications Commission, fixed, terrestrial broadband service at speeds
of at least 25 megabits per second download and at least 3 megabits per second
upload is unavailable at the time the communications service provider
requests access. An unserved area also includes an area that was previously
served but has become unserved due to damage or destruction by a natural
disaster. A pole or underground installation shall be presumed to be located in
an unserved area if the pole is located in an area that is the subject of a federal
or State grant to deploy broadband service, the conditions of which limit the
availability of a grant to unserved areas.areas or, in the case of a damaged or
destroyed facility, was in such an area when the facility was originally
constructed.
(10) Utility. – As defined by 47 U.S.C. § 224.
…."
SECTION 2.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law. Funds encumbered for
expenses incurred as of June 1, 2021, prior to the effective date of this Part shall remain eligible
for reimbursement.

PART III. BROADBAND FUND FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 143B-1373.2 is repealed.
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 143B-1374 is repealed.
SECTION 3.3.(a) The Department of Information Technology shall use funds
appropriated for the Growing Rural Economies with Access to Technology program for fixed
wireless and satellite broadband grants, established in G.S. 143B-1373.2, to award grants to
eligible entities to purchase installation materials for satellite internet service. Installation
materials and internet service must be for the grantee's own use and not for distribution to other
parties. No portion of funds granted under this section shall be used for internet service
subscriptions. The Department shall prioritize grant applicants that operate in one of the 39
counties designated as a disaster area due to Hurricane Helene. The Department may also give
priority to grantees that offer emergency services, disaster relief, educational services, or
economic development.
Page 4 House Bill 819-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.3.(b) For the purposes of this section, an eligible entity is one of the
following:
(1) A State agency.
(2) A local government entity.
(3) A volunteer fire department.
(4) An anchor point, as that term is defined in G.S. 117-18.1(d)(1).
SECTION 3.4.(a) The Department of Information Technology may provide
emergency funding to communications service providers to rebuild, repair, or replace broadband
infrastructure damaged by Hurricane Helene, including reimbursement of costs already incurred
for rebuilding, repairing, or replacing broadband infrastructure, provided that all of the following
apply:
(1) An applicant for funding under this section shall only be permitted to recover
costs that are not subject to reimbursement from another source of external
funding, including insurance.
(2) The Department may cap reimbursement at a portion of the costs incurred
based upon evaluation of considerations such as the number of applications
anticipated compared to funds available.
(3) Priority shall be given to restoration of broadband service.
SECTION 3.4.(b) The Department may use up to fifty million dollars ($50,000,000)
of the funds available from the Broadband Make Ready Accelerator appropriation in S.L.
2021-180 for the emergency funding described in subsection (a) of this section. Funds shall be
used in compliance with applicable federal guidelines associated with the use of federal funds.
The Department may use its emergency procurement authority provided in 09 NCAC 06B .1302
to procure any goods or services in accordance with this section and shall document the request
for funding, the emergency situation or need, the area to be served, and the community's need for
the procurement.
SECTION 3.5. Section 38.15 of S.L. 2021-180, as enacted by Section 16.1(a) of
S.L. 2022-6, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 38.15. Except as otherwise provided, provided and after the intent of the original
appropriation has been satisfied to the extent practicable, the Department of Information
Technology shall have flexibility to transfer funding between the programs outlined in Section
38.4, Section 38.5, and Section 38.6 38.6, and Sections 38.10(b) through (k) of this act, so long
as the total allocations for the programs remain the same.act."

PART IV. BEAD DEPLOYMENT CHANGES
SECTION 4.1. Section 10.2 of S.L. 2024-55 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 10.2.(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) BEAD. – Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment.
(2) Broadband service. – For the purposes of this section, a terrestrially deployed
mass-market retail service by wire or radio that provides the capability to
transmit data to and receive data from all or substantially all internet
endpoints, including any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the
operation of the communications service, but excluding dial-up internet access
service.
…
(8) Extremely high cost per location threshold. – A BEAD subsidy cost per
location above which the Office may decline to select a proposal if use of an
alternative technology meeting the BEAD Program's technical requirements
is necessitated by the fact that selection of an eligible project proposing to
provision service via end-to-end fiber-optic facilities to each end-user
premises would be cost prohibitive. The Office will develop a methodology
House Bill 819-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for calculating this threshold in a manner that maximizes use of the best
available technology while ensuring that the program can, at a minimum, meet
the prioritization requirements. The Office will post the methodology for
public comment before implementation. The Office shall not, unless it is
determined that it does not have sufficient funding to select each
highest-scoring application in the initial round described in this section, utilize
the extremely high cost per location threshold in the initial round.
…
(14) Low-cost broadband service option. – A broadband service offered to
low-income households that meets the eligibility requirements for the federal
Affordable Connectivity Program, or similar replacement program, in the
project area for at least the length of time defined by federal requirements. A
low-cost broadband service option must be made available and include the
following elements:As defined in the IIJA and as interpreted by any
subsequent guidance issued by NTIA.
a. Provide typical download speeds of at least 100 Mbps and typical
upload speeds of at least 20 Mbps.
b. Provide typical latency measurements of no more than 100
milliseconds.
c. Not be subject to nongovernmental imposed surcharges and be subject
only to the same acceptable use policies to which subscribers to all
other broadband internet access service plans offered to home
subscribers by the participating subgrantee must adhere.
d. Shall be offered at a price that does not exceed the highest price listed
in the FCC's 2024 Urban Rate Survey data for Fixed Broadband
Service for a service offering in North Carolina that provides a
download speed of 100 Mbps, upload speed of 20 Mbps, and an
unlimited capacity allowance. The price may be adjusted by the
subgrantee based on the Consumer Price Index, as defined by the
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, beginning with an adjustment
in the first new calendar year after the date of enactment of this section.
e. In the event the provider later increases the speeds of one of its
low-cost plans, it will permit eligible subscribers that are subscribed
to that plan to upgrade to those new speeds at no more than a
commensurate change in cost.
…
(20) Reliable broadband service. – Terrestrial-based broadband service (i) with
ninety-five percent (95%) of latency measurements during testing windows
falling at or below 100 milliseconds round-trip time and (ii) which is designed
to ensure that network outages should not exceed, on average, 48 hours over
any 365-day period except in the case of natural disasters or other force
majeure occurrences. Locations served exclusively by satellite, terrestrial
fixed wireless services utilizing entirely licensed spectrum, using a hybrid of
licensed and unlicensed spectrum, or a technology not specified by the FCC
for purposes of its Broadband DATA Maps do not meet the definition of
"reliable broadband service" and will be considered "unserved" for the
purposes of determining eligible locations.As defined in the IIJA and as
interpreted by any subsequent guidance issued by NTIA.
(21) Secretary. – The Secretary of Information Technology.
(22) Subgrantee. – An eligible recipient who receives BEAD funds for an eligible
project.
Page 6 House Bill 819-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(23) Underserved. – A BSL that has access to reliable broadband service equal to
or greater than 25 Mbps download and 3 Mbps upload but less than 100 Mbps
download and 20 Mbps upload. Unless otherwise determined by the
Department based on competent findings of fact, locations that the FCC's
Broadband DATA Maps show to have available qualifying broadband service
delivered via (i) DSL or (ii) terrestrial fixed wireless services utilizing entirely
licensed spectrum, or using a hybrid of licensed and unlicensed spectrum,
shall be considered "underserved" for the purpose of determining eligible
locations.As defined in the IIJA and as interpreted by any subsequent
guidance issued by NTIA.
(24) Unserved. – A BSL that does not have access to reliable broadband service
with transmission speeds of at least 25 Mbps download and at least 3 Mbps
upload.As defined in the IIJA and as interpreted by any subsequent guidance
issued by NTIA.
…
"SECTION 10.2.(j) Competitive Subgrantee Selection Process. – The Office shall
implement a competitive subgrantee selection process that conforms with published regulations
and guidelines under the BEAD Program under the IIJA. Applications receiving the highest score
shall receive priority status for the awarding of subgrants pursuant to this section. As a means of
breaking a tie for applications receiving the same score, the Office shall give priority to the
application proposing to serve the highest number of new unserved and underserved locations.
Applications shall be scored on an objective 100-point scale that is published prior to the
submission of applications for subgrants. The Office shall determine whether or not a subgrantee
has the capacity to perform multiple projects and shall not be required to award multiple projects
to a prequalified subgrantee that has failed to demonstrate its ability to perform.
…."

PART V. LIFELINE SERVICE PROVIDERS
SECTION 5.1. Article 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-30.1. Designating telecommunications carriers; rules.
(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 62-3(23)j. or G.S. 62-30, the Utilities Commission may, solely
upon petition of any provider or reseller of mobile radio communications service, designate the
petitioning provider or reseller of mobile radio communications service as an eligible
telecommunications carrier pursuant to 47 C.F.R. § 54.201 for purposes of providing Lifeline
service. The Commission may adopt rules to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(b) Nothing in this section shall confer upon the Utilities Commission any regulatory
jurisdiction over providers or resellers of mobile radio communications service that have been
previously designated as eligible telecommunications carriers for purposes of providing Lifeline
service prior to the enactment of this section."

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2025.
House Bill 819-Third Edition Page 7